Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-11] Payment of rate enhancement.
The rate enhancements referred to in section 346F-10 shall be retroactive to
July 1, 2012. Retroactive rate enhancements shall be paid within thirty days
of notification by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to the
department of all necessary approvals. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013,
c 142, §§2(3), 3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2012" substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next